Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE B. INFORMATION AND PLANNING

CHAPTER 2058. RECOGNITION OF FEDERAL CENSUS

Sec. 2058.001. GOVERNMENTAL RECOGNITION OF AND ACTION ON FEDERAL CENSUS. (a) A governmental entity may not recognize or act on a report or publication, in any form, of a federal decennial census, in whole or in part, before September 1 of the year after the calendar year during which the census was taken.

(b) A governmental entity shall recognize and act on a published report or count relating to a federal decennial census and released by the director of the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of Commerce on the later of:

(1) September 1 of the year after the calendar year during which the census was taken; or

(2) the first day of the first calendar month occurring after the 150th day after the date of the publication of the report or count.

(c) In this section, "governmental entity" means the state or an agency or political subdivision of the state.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 682 (H.B. 2025), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2021.

Sec. 2058.002. EXCEPTIONS. (a) The legislature or the Legislative Redistricting Board under Article III, Section 28, of the Texas Constitution may officially recognize or act on a federal decennial census before September 1 of the year after the calendar year during which the census was taken.

(b) A political subdivision governed by a body elected from single-member districts may recognize and act on tabulations of population of a federal decennial census, for redistricting purposes, on or after the date the governor receives a report of the basic tabulations of population from the secretary of commerce under 13 U.S.C. Section 141(c). This subsection does not apply to a political subdivision that was not subject to a statute requiring certain political subdivisions, classified by population, to elect their governing bodies from single-member districts under the preceding federal census.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 682 (H.B. 2025), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2021.